Maryland, session 2026, SB0374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
8–402.
(b) All revenues collected from the following, after deductions provided by law,
shall be credited to the Gasoline and Motor Vehicle Revenue Account:
(1) All of the motor vehicle fuel tax;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0374*

SENATE BILL 374
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, two–thirds of the revenue from
the vehicle titling tax, excluding revenue attributable to[:
(i) A] A vehicle titling tax rate in excess of 6%[; or
(ii) The vehicle titling tax imposed on rental vehicles under §
13–809(c)(1)(ii) of this article];
(3) Except for revenues collected under Title 13, Subtitle 9, Parts III and
IV of this article, vehicle registration fees;
(4) The revenue disbursed to this Account under § 2–614 of the Tax –
General Article; and
(5) 80% of the funds distributed on short–term vehicle rentals under §
2–1302.1 of the Tax – General Article to the Transportation Trust Fund from the sales and
use tax.
13–809.
(c) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b)(2) of this section, the tax imposed
by this section is[:
(i) Except as provided in item (ii) of this paragraph,] 6.5% of the fair
market value of the vehicle[; or
(ii) For a rental vehicle, 3.5% of the fair market value of the vehicle].
13–810.
(a) On issuance in this State of an original or subsequent certificate of title for a
vehicle, the vehicle is exempt from the excise tax imposed by this part, if it is:
(24) A vehicle acquired by a religious, charitable, or volunteer organization
exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, the Department of
Human Services, or a local department of social services for the purpose of transferring the
vehicle to a Family Investment Program recipient or an individual certified by the
Department of Human Services or a local department of social services as eligible for the
transfer; [or]
(25) A vehicle that is transferred to a trust or from a trust to one or more
beneficiaries in accordance with § 14.5–1001 of the Estates and Trusts Article; OR
(26) A RENTAL VEHICLE.

SENATE BILL 374 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.